Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1015
Attached property; subsequent orders; procedure.

When the property is under attachment, it shall be attached under subsequent orders as follows: (1) If it is real property, it shall be attached in the manner prescribed in section 25-1008; (2) if it is personal property, it shall be attached as in the hands of the officer and subject to any previous attachment; and (3) if the same person or corporation be made a garnishee, a copy of the order and notice shall be left with him in the manner prescribed in section 25-1011.

R.S.1867, Code § 210, p. 427;

R.S.1913, § 7744;

C.S.1922, § 8688;

C.S.1929, § 20-1015;

R.S.1943, § 25-1015;

Laws 1959, c. 102, § 1, p. 425.

Cannot levy subsequent orders after property is taken from control by replevin. Merrill v. Wedgwood, 25 Neb. 283, 41 N.W. 149 (1888).